Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 11 Locksmith Licensing Act of 2006
62-11-118. Locksmiths licensed in another state or territory.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a locksmith, licensed in another state or territory, who relocates to this state, shall apply for licensure pursuant to this chapter and meet all requirements set forth in this chapter, and all rules promulgated thereto, prior to providing locksmithing services in this state.

No locksmith, licensed in another state or territory, shall have to meet the initial qualification education requirements for licensure in this state or be required to pass the administrated locksmith exam if such locksmith has any one (1) of the following American Locksmith of America (ALOA) certified designations:

Certified registered locksmith (CRL);

Certified professional locksmith (CPL); or

Certified master locksmith (CML).

Acts 2012, ch. 797, § 2.

62-11-116. Display of license number.